Utah statutes.
48-2e-607.   Liability to other persons of person dissociated as general partner.

(1)  A person's dissociation as a general partner does not of itself discharge the person's liability as a general partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited partnership incurred before dissociation.  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2) and (3), the person is not liable for a limited partnership obligation incurred after dissociation.

(2)  A person whose dissociation as a general partner resulted in a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership's activities and affairs is liable to the same extent as a general partner under Section 48-2e-404 on an obligation incurred by the limited partnership under Section 48-2e-804.

(3)  A person that has dissociated as a general partner but whose dissociation did not result in a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership's activities and affairs is liable on a transaction entered into by the limited partnership after the dissociation only if:

(a)  a general partner would be liable on the transaction; and

(b)  at the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(i)  less than two years has passed since the dissociation; and

(ii)  the other party does not have knowledge or notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner.

(4)  By agreement with a creditor of a limited partnership and the limited partnership, a person dissociated as a general partner may be released from liability for an obligation of the limited partnership.

(5)  A person dissociated as a general partner is released from liability for an obligation of the limited partnership if the limited partnership's creditor, with knowledge or notice of the person's dissociation as a general partner but without the person's consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of the obligation.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

